Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.021

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(2) "Director" means the director of licensing or the director's designee.

(3) "Sale of travel-related benefits" means the sale of travel services if the travel services are not identified at the time of the sale with respect to dates, price, or location and includes:

(a) Sales of travel club memberships;

(b) Sales of vacation certificates or other documents that purport to grant the holder of the certificate or other document the ability to obtain future travel services, with or without additional consideration; or

(c) Sales of travel-industry member benefits including those through either or both the issuance and sale or the consulting with or advising for consideration of persons in connection with the obtaining of international airlines travel agent network identification cards or memberships.

(4) "Travel club" means a seller of travel that sells memberships to consumers, where the initial membership or maintenance dues are at least twice the amount of the annual membership or maintenance dues.

(5) "Seller of travel-related benefits" means a person, firm, or corporation that transacts business with Washington consumers for the sale of travel-related benefits.

(6) "Seller of travel" means a person, firm, or corporation both inside and outside the state of Washington, who transacts business with Washington consumers.

(a) "Seller of travel" includes a travel agent and any person who is an independent contractor or outside agent for a travel agency or other seller of travel whose principal duties include consulting with and advising persons concerning travel arrangements or accommodations in the conduct or administration of its business. If a seller of travel is employed by a seller of travel who is registered under this chapter, the employee need not also be registered.

(b) "Seller of travel" does not include:

(i) An air carrier;

(ii) An owner or operator of a vessel, including an ocean common carrier as defined in 46 U.S.C. App. 1702(18), an owner or charterer of a vessel that is required to establish its financial responsibility in accordance with the requirements of the federal maritime commission, 46 U.S.C. App. 817 (e), and a steamboat company whether or not operating over and upon the waters of this state;

(iii) A motor carrier;

(iv) A rail carrier;

(v) A charter party carrier of passengers as defined in RCW 81.70.020;

(vi) An auto transportation company as defined in RCW 81.68.010;

(vii) A hotel or other lodging accommodation;

(viii) An affiliate of any person or entity described in (i) through (vii) of this subsection (6)(b) that is primarily engaged in the sale of travel services provided by the person or entity. For purposes of this subsection (6)(b)(viii), an "affiliate" means a person or entity owning, owned by, or under common ownership, with "owning," "owned," and "ownership" referring to equity holdings of at least eighty percent;

(ix) Direct providers of transportation by air, sea, or ground, or hotel or other lodging accommodations who do not book or arrange any other travel services.

(7) "Travel services" includes transportation by air, sea, or ground, hotel or any lodging accommodations, package tours, or vouchers or coupons to be redeemed for future travel or accommodations for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration.

(8) "Advertisement" includes, but is not limited to, a written or graphic representation in a card, brochure, newspaper, magazine, directory listing, or display, and oral, written, or graphic representations made by radio, television, or cable transmission that relates to travel services.

(9) "Transacts business with Washington consumers" means to directly offer or sell travel services or travel-related benefits to Washington consumers, including the placement of advertising in media based in the state of Washington or that is primarily directed to Washington residents. Advertising placed in national print or electronic media alone does not constitute "transacting business with Washington consumers." Those entities who only wholesale travel services are not "transacting business with Washington consumers" for the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2001 c 44 s 1; 2000 c 171 s 73; 1996 c 180 s 1; 1994 c 237 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 180: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 28, 1996]." [ 1996 c 180 s 10.]